Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.007

Staffing enrichments to the program of basic education. (Effective until September 1, 2024.)

(1) In addition to the staffing units in RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction must provide school districts with allocations for the following staff units if and to the extent that funding is specifically appropriated and designated for that category of staffing unit in the omnibus operating appropriations act.

(a) Additional staffing units for each level of prototypical school in RCW 28A.150.260:

Elementary School

Middle School

High School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level administrators. . . .

0.0470

0.0470

0.0200

Teacher-librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology, and media to support school library media programs. . . .

0.3370

0.4810

0.4770

Health and social services:

School nurses. . . .

0.5090

0.8280

0.7280

Social workers. . . .

0.2690

0.0820

0.1120

Psychologists. . . .

0.0870

0.0220

0.0420

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation advising. . . .

0.0070

0.7840

0.9610

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional services provided by classified employees. . . .

1.0640

0.3000

0.3480

Office support and other noninstructional aides. . . .

0.9880

1.1750

0.2310

Custodians. . . .

0.0430

0.0580

0.0350

Classified staff providing student and staff safety. . . .

0.0000

0.6080

1.1590

Parent involvement coordinators. . . .

0.9175

1.0000

1.0000

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units sufficient to achieve the following reductions in class size in each level of prototypical school under RCW 28A.150.260:

General education

certificated instructional

staff units sufficient to

achieve class size reduction of:

Grades K-3 class size. . . .0.00

Grade 4. . . .2.00

Grades 5-6. . . .2.00

Grades 7-8. . . .3.53

Grades 9-12. . . .3.74

CTE. . . .4.00

Skills. . . .4.00

High poverty

certificated instructional

staff units sufficient to

achieve class size reduction of:

Grades K-3 class size. . . .2.00

Grade 4. . . .5.00

Grades 5-6. . . .4.00

Grades 7-8. . . .5.53

Grades 9-12. . . .5.74

(2) The staffing units in subsection (1) of this section are an enrichment to and are beyond the state's statutory program of basic education in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260. However, if and to the extent that any of these additional staffing units are funded by specific reference to this section in the omnibus operating appropriations act, those units become part of prototypical school funding formulas and a component of the state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school districts in offering the statutory program of basic education under Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 904.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: "The legislature recognizes that legislation enacted in 2014 and 2015 established a phase-in of increased school district staffing ratios. Under current law, these increased staffing ratios begin in the 2019-2021 biennium and exceed the school district staffing ratios established in chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (Substitute House Bill No. 2776) and in chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. In light of the education investments funded pursuant to the 2010 and 2017 legislation, the legislature intends to review and prioritize future staffing ratio increases to focus on reducing the opportunity gap, assisting struggling students, enhancing the educational outcomes for all students, and strengthening support for all schools and school district staff." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 903.]

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

PDFRCW 28A.400.007

Staffing enrichments to the program of basic education.

(1) In addition to the staffing units in RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction must provide school districts with allocations for the following staff units if and to the extent that funding is specifically appropriated and designated for that category of staffing unit in the omnibus operating appropriations act.

(a) Additional staffing units for each level of prototypical school in RCW 28A.150.260:

Elementary School

Middle School

High School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level administrators. . . .

0.0470

0.0470

0.0200

Teacher-librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology, and media to support school library media programs. . . .

0.3370

0.4810

0.4770

Paraeducators, including any aspect of educational instructional services provided by classified employees. . . .

0.988

0.224

0.272

Office support and other noninstructional aides. . . .

0.912

1.099

0.155

Custodians. . . .

0.0430

0.0580

0.0350

Classified staff providing student and staff safety. . . .

0.0000

0.6080

1.1590

Parent involvement coordinators. . . .

0.9175

1.0000

1.0000

(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units sufficient to achieve the following reductions in class size in each level of prototypical school under RCW 28A.150.260:

General education

certificated instructional

staff units sufficient to

achieve class size reduction of:

Grades K-3 class size. . . .0.00

Grade 4. . . .2.00

Grades 5-6. . . .2.00

Grades 7-8. . . .3.53

Grades 9-12. . . .3.74

CTE. . . .4.00

Skills. . . . 3.00

High poverty

certificated instructional

staff units sufficient to

achieve class size reduction of:

Grades K-3 class size. . . .2.00

Grade 4. . . .5.00

Grades 5-6. . . .4.00

Grades 7-8. . . .5.53

Grades 9-12. . . .5.74

(2) The staffing units in subsection (1) of this section are an enrichment to and are beyond the state's statutory program of basic education in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260. However, if and to the extent that any of these additional staffing units are funded by specific reference to this section in the omnibus operating appropriations act, those units become part of prototypical school funding formulas and a component of the state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school districts in offering the statutory program of basic education under Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution.

[ 2024 c 191 s 3; 2022 c 109 s 5; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 904.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The effective date of 2022 c 109 s 5 is September 1, 2024. However, 2022 c 109 s 5 was amended by 2024 c 191 s 3, which has an effective date of June 6, 2024. Consequently, the effective date of this section is June 6, 2024.

Intent—2024 c 191: See note following RCW 28A.150.260.

Effective date—2022 c 109 ss 4 and 5: See note following RCW 28A.150.260.

Intent—2022 c 109: See note following RCW 28A.300.476.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: "The legislature recognizes that legislation enacted in 2014 and 2015 established a phase-in of increased school district staffing ratios. Under current law, these increased staffing ratios begin in the 2019-2021 biennium and exceed the school district staffing ratios established in chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (Substitute House Bill No. 2776) and in chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. In light of the education investments funded pursuant to the 2010 and 2017 legislation, the legislature intends to review and prioritize future staffing ratio increases to focus on reducing the opportunity gap, assisting struggling students, enhancing the educational outcomes for all students, and strengthening support for all schools and school district staff." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 903.]

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.